Maryland, session 2025, HB0193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–1007.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Commission
shall impose against an employer or, if insured, its insurer an assessment equal to 1% of:
(i) each award against the employer for permanent disability or
death, including awards for disfigurement or mutilation; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each
amount payable by the employer or its insurer under a settlement agreement approved by
the Commission.
(2) The amount of medical benefits specified in a formal set–aside
allocation that is part of an approved settlement agreement shall be excluded from the
assessment imposed by the Commission under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection if:
(i) 1. the amount of medical benefits is in excess of $50,000; and
2. the payment of medical benefits by the employer or its
insurer is directly to an authorized insurer that provides periodic payments to the covered
employee pursuant to a single premium annuity; or
(ii) 1. the amount of medical benefits is in any amount; and
2. the payment of medical benefits by the employer or its
insurer is to an independent third–party administrator that controls and pays the medical
services in accordance with the formal set–aside allocation, provided there is no
reversionary interest to the covered employee or the covered employee’s beneficiaries.
(3) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the employer is a
corporation the assets of which are not sufficient to satisfy an assessment, any officer of the
corporation who has responsibility for the general management of the corporation in the
State is jointly and severally liable for the assessment if the corporate officer knowingly
failed to secure workers’ compensation insurance.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the employer is a
limited liability company the assets of which are not sufficient to satisfy an assessment,
any member of the limited liability company who has responsibility for the general
management of the limited liability company in the State is jointly and severally liable for

HOUSE BILL 193 3
the assessment if a member of the limited liability company who has general management
responsibility knowingly failed to secure workers’ compensation insurance.
(b) Notwithstanding the limit on the balance of the Fund under § 9–1011 of this
subtitle, if the Board determines that the reserves of the Fund are inadequate to meet
anticipated losses, the Board may direct the Commission to assess UP TO an additional
[1%] 2% 1.5% under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Any fractional dollar of payment under this section shall be rounded off to the
nearest whole dollar.
(d) The Commission shall direct payment of an assessment under subsection (a)
or (b) of this section into the Fund.
(e) Payments under this section are in addition to the payment of compensation
to a covered employee or the dependents of a covered employee under this title.
9–1011.
(a) (1) When the amount of the Fund equals at least [$5,000,000]
$10,000,000, the payment of assessments by employers and insurers is suspended.
(2) The Director shall notify each self–insured employer and insurer of the
suspension of the payment of assessments under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) (1) Payment of assessments shall be resumed if:
(i) the amount of the Fund becomes less than [$3,000,000]
$8,000,000 because of payments made under § 9–1002 of this subtitle or other payments;
or
(ii) the Director determines that payments that are likely to be made
from the Fund in the next 3 months will reduce the amount of the Fund to less than
[$3,000,000] $8,000,000.
(2) When payment of assessments is to be resumed under paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Director shall notify each self–insured employer and insurer that
payment of assessments is to:
(i) resume on a specified date; and
(ii) continue until the amount of the Fund becomes at least
[$5,000,000] $10,000,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

HOUSE BILL 193
(a) The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall designate a special monitor to
assess the financial condition of the Uninsured Employers’ Fund, including the reserve
setting and third–party administrator practices of the Fund.
(b) The special monitor shall monitor the financial condition of the Fund for a
period of up to 1 year, with the duties of the special monitor ending on or before June 30,
2026, unless an earlier date is agreed on by the Fund and the Commission.
(c) The special monitor shall submit to the Senate Finance Committee and the
House Economic Matters Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article:
(1) on or before December 1, 2025, an interim report regarding the financial
condition of the Uninsured Employers’ Fund and any recommendations for legislative or
regulatory changes necessary to improve the condition of the Fund; and
(2) on or before June 1, 2026, a final report regarding the financial
condition of the Uninsured Employers’ Fund and any recommendations for legislative or
regulatory changes necessary to improve the condition of the Fund.
(d) The Fund shall reimburse the monitor at a rate commensurate with the rate
the Commission pays to retired judges to hear cases before the Commission.
(e) The Fund shall allocate $100,000 to provide funding for the special monitor.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end
of June 30, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.